District of Columbia statutes.
1-1320

Subdivision plat; certification.

Whenever the proprietor of any square or lot shall deem it necessary to subdivide the same into convenient building lots or portions for sale and occupancy and alleys for their accommodation, he may cause a plat to be made by the Surveyor or a registered land surveyor, on which shall be expressed the dimensions and length of all the lines of such portions as are necessary for defining and laying off the same on the ground, and may certify such subdivision under his hand and seal, in the presence of 2 or more credible witnesses, upon the same plat or on a paper or parchment attached thereto.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1425, ch. 854, § 1581
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 5005(c), 46 DCR 3142

Cross References

Condominium subdivisions, see § 42-2009.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-1321 and § 42-2009.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-920.
1973 Ed., § 1-620.